Tennessee, session 114, SB0209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(1) In addition to subsection (f), and upon request as provided in subdivision
( )(2), the following records or information of active or former sworn state and local law
enforcement officers; correctional and correction probation officers; personnel of the
department of children's services whose duties include the investigation of child abuse,
neglect, exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal activities; personnel of the department
of revenue or of local government agencies whose responsibilities include revenue
collection; justices, judges, chancellors, commissioners, and staff of state and local
courts; district attorneys general; and public defenders are not public records:
(A) Home addresses;
(B) Telephone numbers;
(C) Social security numbers;
(D) Dates of birth; and
(E) Official photographs or photographs taken in the scope of
employment.
(2) For purposes of effectuating subdivision ( )(1), such individual must submit a
written request to each state or local government agency with records of or access to the
information identified in subdivisions ( )(1)(A)-(E) requesting that such information be
SB0209
000911
- 1 -

maintained confidentially. Upon receipt of a request under this subdivision ( )(2), the
respective state or local government entity shall maintain the identified records
confidentially and not make the records available for public inspection.
(3) The governing body of a local government may establish or designate an
individual or agency as responsible for receiving requests under subdivision ( )(2) and
distributing notice to all agencies and departments of the local government for purposes
of compliance with this subsection ( ).
(4) Notwithstanding this subsection ( ), information maintained confidentially
under this subsection ( ) may be released in response to a court order, subpoena, or law
enforcement agency conducting an active investigation.
(5) Information made confidential by this subsection ( ) must be redacted from
public records whenever possible and nothing in this subsection ( ) may be used to limit
or deny access to otherwise public records because a file, document, or data file
contains confidential information.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000911